Arkansas statutes. Title 1 General Provisions
Chapter 5

Holidays and Observances

Cross References.

Bonds in actions may be dated on holiday, §16-58-106.

Process may be issued on holiday, §16-58-106.

Preambles.

Acts 1973, No. 7 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, birds have always played an important part in Arkansas, past and present, recreationally, aesthetically, and ecologically; and

“Whereas, it is important to this and future generations that the people of this State recognize the importance of positive, definitive, and continuing efforts to preserve the ecology of the State; and

“Whereas, John James Audubon was one of the earliest to record North American birds in their natural habitat; and

“Now, Therefore … .”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1969, No. 16, § 2: Jan. 1, 1971.

Acts 1975, No. 976, § 9: Apr. 9, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is an urgent need to establish a more clearly defined designation of certain legal holidays in order to protect the public health, safety and welfare and the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to accomplish this purpose; therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 385, § 3: Mar. 12, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under present Arkansas law, the second Tuesday in March is designated as ‘Arkansas Teachers Day’; that the date for commemorating Arkansas teachers should be changed to the first Tuesday in March to coincide with similar days of commemoration in other states, and that this Act should be given effect immediately in order that the date of ‘Arkansas Teachers Day’ will officially be designated the first Tuesday in March for the year 1979 and thereafter. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

1-5-101. Official holidays.

(a)

The following days are declared to be the sole official holidays applicable to state government in Arkansas:

(1)

New Year's Day — January 1;

(2)

Dr. Martin Luther King Jr.'s Birthday — the third Monday in January;

(3)

George Washington's Birthday and Daisy Gatson Bates Day — the third Monday in February;

(4)

Memorial Day — the last Monday in May;

(5)

Independence Day — July 4;

(6)

Labor Day — the first Monday in September;

(7)

Veterans Day — November 11;

(8)

Thanksgiving Day — the fourth Thursday in November;

(9)

Christmas Eve — December 24;

(10)

Christmas Day — December 25; and

(11)

An employee's birthday — an employee is granted one (1) holiday to observe his or her birthday.

(b)

A holiday falling on a Saturday will be observed on the preceding Friday. A holiday falling on a Sunday will be observed on the succeeding Monday.

(c)

It is the specific intent of the General Assembly that all state employees shall be entitled to eleven (11) paid holidays per year. The Office of Personnel Management shall promulgate rules and regulations to assure this legislative intent.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 211, § 1; 1947, No. 215, § 1; 1955, No. 29, § 1; 1963, No. 216, § 1; 1969, No. 16, § 1; 1971, No. 370, § 1; 1973, No. 664, § 1; 1975, No. 976, §§ 1, 3, 6; 1983, No. 833, § 1; 1985, No. 985, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 69-101, 69-101.1, 69-115; Acts 2001, No. 304, § 1; 2017, No. 561, § 4.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 561, § 6, provided: “Legislative findings — Intent.

“(a)

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

The State of Arkansas has a very proud and distinguished culture and heritage;

“(2)

Robust recognition of history in the classroom is a priority; and

“(3)

The state should maintain and celebrate its culture and heritage, including our state and national military leaders who are connected to Arkansas or have impacted the course of our state's history.

“(b)

It is the intent of the General Assembly by the enactment of this act to maintain an awareness of and celebrate the unique cultural heritage of Arkansas by educating Arkansas youth regarding:

“(1)

Historical events of state and national significance;

“(2)

The contributions made to the history of this state by military and civilian leaders; and

“(3)

The reasons for honoring such historical events and figures through the observance of days designated for their commemoration.”

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment, in (a)(2), deleted “and Robert E. Lee's Birthday” following “Jr.'s Birthday”.

1-5-102. State offices to be closed on holidays — Exceptions.

(a)

All state offices shall be closed on all days declared to be legal holidays under the laws of this state, and all persons employed thereby shall not be required to work on legal holidays. However, this section shall not apply to those state government offices wherever located and to those employees that are essential to the preservation and protection of the public peace, health, and safety, nor to the offices of the various constitutional officers who may use their own discretion in the matter of closing their offices on legal holidays.

(b)

It is the specific intent of this section that all state offices be closed on all legal holidays even though one (1) or more legal holidays shall fall during a regular session, a fiscal session, or an extraordinary session of the General Assembly, provided that, with respect to state offices located in Pulaski County, those offices shall not be closed for any legal holiday during a regular session, a fiscal session, or an extraordinary session of the General Assembly unless they are permitted to close by resolution of the General Assembly, but those offices shall maintain only a minimum number of employees necessary to carry on the business of the offices.

(c)

Any state employee who is required to work on a legal holiday, for any reason, shall be entitled to equivalent time off at a later date.

(d)

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, state-supported institutions of higher education in this state may require the employees of the institutions to work on any of the holidays established in §1-5-101, but if the employees are required to work on any day declared as a legal holiday, the employees shall be entitled to equivalent time off on another date.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 370, §§ 2, 3; 1975, No. 976, §§ 2, 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 69-112, 69-113; Acts 2009, No. 962, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Section 10-2-128 provides that, for the observance of the Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr. holiday, the House of Representatives, the Senate, and their committees shall not convene in session or meet on the third Monday in January.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (b), substituted “regular session, a fiscal session, or a” for “general or” and “a regular session, a fiscal session, or a” for “any general session or”.

1-5-103. State office closings by proclamation.

Nothing in §§1-5-101,1-5-102, and1-5-104 shall be construed as prohibiting the Governor from establishing by executive proclamation additional days when state offices shall be closed in observance of special events, or for other reasons at his or her discretion.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 976, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 69-112.1.

1-5-104. Entitlement to paid holiday or equivalent time.

(a)

To be eligible for holiday pay, the employee must be on pay status his or her last scheduled work day before the holiday and his or her first scheduled work day after the holiday.

(b)

When a holiday falls while an employee is on annual or sick leave, that day is charged as a holiday and that day will not be charged against his or her annual or sick leave.

(c)

When a holiday falls on an employee's regular scheduled day off, he or she will be given equivalent time off.

(d)

The following provisions apply to employees who cannot take holidays as scheduled:

(1)

Employees must work on holidays when the needs of the agency require it. Department or agency directors will determine the need;

(2)

Days off for holidays worked may be taken at a time approved by the employee's supervisor. They are to be taken as soon as it is practical; and

(3)

Supervisors are responsible for scheduling days off in lieu of holidays for their employees. Department heads and supervisors are responsible for informing their employees of the schedule and the observance of all provisions.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 976, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 69-115.

1-5-105. Commercial paper payable day after holiday.

All bills of exchange, drafts, or promissory notes which shall become payable on a legal holiday shall be payable on the day next succeeding the holiday.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 211, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 69-103.

Cross References.

Banking business may be done on day following holiday, §23-48-103.

1-5-106. Memorial days generally.

The following days shall not be legal holidays but shall be memorial days to be commemorated by the issuance of appropriate proclamations by the Governor:

(1)

General Douglas MacArthur Day — January 26;

(2)

Silas Hunt Day — February 2;

(3)

Abraham Lincoln's Birthday — February 12;

(4)

Arkansas Teachers' Day — First Tuesday in March;

(5)

Arbor Day — Third Monday in March;

(6)

Patriots' Day — April 19;

(7)

Arkansas Bird Day — April 26;

(8)

Good Friday — Friday preceding Easter;

(9)

Jefferson Davis' Birthday — June 3;

(10)

Columbus Day — October 12;

(11)

Senator Hattie W. Caraway Day — December 19;

(12)

Robert E. Lee Day — Second Saturday in October; and

(13)

John H. Johnson Day — November 1.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 211, § 2; 1947, No. 215, § 2; 1967, No. 500, § 1; 1973, No. 7, § 1; 1975, No. 291, § 1; 1977, No. 372, § 1; 1977, No. 538, § 1; 1979, No. 385, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 69-102, 69-114, 69-116; Acts 2001, No. 1218, § 1; 2007, No. 374, § 1; 2017, No. 561, § 5; 2019, No. 1062, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 561, § 6, provided: “Legislative findings — Intent.

“(a)

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

The State of Arkansas has a very proud and distinguished culture and heritage;

“(2)

Robust recognition of history in the classroom is a priority; and

“(3)

The state should maintain and celebrate its culture and heritage, including our state and national military leaders who are connected to Arkansas or have impacted the course of our state's history.

“(b)

It is the intent of the General Assembly by the enactment of this act to maintain an awareness of and celebrate the unique cultural heritage of Arkansas by educating Arkansas youth regarding:

“(1)

Historical events of state and national significance;

“(2)

The contributions made to the history of this state by military and civilian leaders; and

“(3)

The reasons for honoring such historical events and figures through the observance of days designated for their commemoration.”

Acts 2019, No. 1062, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings and intent.

“(a)

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

John H. Johnson is widely regarded as the most influential African-American publisher in United States history;

“(2)

Mr. Johnson was born in Arkansas City, Arkansas, where he lived until he was in the eighth grade;

“(3)

After moving to Chicago to attend high school and college, Mr. Johnson began his publishing career;

“(4)

In 1945, Mr. Johnson launched Ebony which has remained a widely circulated African-American magazine in the world every year since its founding;

“(5)

Mr. Johnson's publishing career expanded with the creation of Jet, the world’s largest African-American newsweekly magazine, and he later expanded his business interests to book publishing, television production, and other business enterprises;

“(6)

In addition to his business and publishing careers, Mr. Johnson was highly involved in community service at both the local and the national level; and

“(7)

Over the course of decades, Mr. Johnson served as a board member or trustee for numerous business, philanthropic, and cultural organizations, and received numerous awards, including the Presidential Medal of Freedom awarded in 1996 awarded by President Bill Clinton, and more than thirty honorary doctoral degrees from institutions across the country.

“(b)

It is the intent of the General Assembly to recognize John H. Johnson and his achievements and contributions to the state and the nation by enacting a memorial day in his honor to be celebrated on November 1 each year.”

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment added (2) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2017 amendment added (12).

The 2019 amendment added (13).

1-5-107. Confederate Flag Day.

The Saturday immediately preceding Easter Sunday of each year is designated as “Confederate Flag Day” in this state.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 124, § 1; 1967, No. 455, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 69-110, 69-111; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 490.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment deleted former (b) and (c) and made a related change.

1-5-108. White Cane Safety Day.

(a)

October 15 of each year is declared to be “White Cane Safety Day”.

(b)

The Governor shall annually prior to October 15 issue a proclamation proclaiming October 15 as “White Cane Safety Day” and in the proclamation shall:

(1)

Comment upon the significance of the white cane;

(2)

Call upon the citizens of the state to observe the provisions of §20-14-301 et seq. and to take precautions necessary to the safety of the visually impaired, hearing impaired, and other persons with physical disabilities;

(3)

Remind the citizens of the state of the policies of the state with respect to the visually impaired, hearing impaired, and other persons with physical disabilities, as prescribed by §20-14-301 et seq., and urge the citizens to cooperate in carrying out those policies; and

(4)

Emphasize the need for the citizens of this state to:

(A)

Be aware of the presence of the visually impaired, hearing impaired, and other persons with physical disabilities in the community;

(B)

Keep safe and functional for the visually impaired, hearing impaired, and other persons with physical disabilities the:

(i)

Streets;

(ii)

Highways;

(iii)

Sidewalks;

(iv)

Walkways;

(v)

Public buildings;

(vi)

Public facilities;

(vii)

Other public places;

(viii)

Places of public accommodation, amusement, and resort; and

(ix)

Other places to which the public is invited; and

(C)

Offer assistance to the visually impaired, hearing impaired, and other persons with physical disabilities upon appropriate occasions.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 484, § 7; 1979, No. 574, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-2907; Acts 1997, No. 208, § 2; 2001, No. 1553, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1997, No. 208, § 1, as reenacted by Acts 2017, No. 255, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent and purpose.

The General Assembly hereby acknowledges that many of the laws relating to individuals with disabilities are antiquated, functionally outmoded, derogatory, and ambiguous or are inconsistent with more recently enacted provisions of the law.
Consequently, it is the intent of the General Assembly and the purpose of this act to clarify the relevant chapters of Titles 1, 6, 9, 13, 14, 16, 17, 20, 22, 23, and 27 of the Arkansas Code of 1987 Annotated.”

1-5-109. Prisoners of War Remembrance Day.

(a)

The ninth day of April of each year shall hereafter be known as “Prisoners of War Remembrance Day”.

(b)

On this day every Arkansan is encouraged to commemorate the sacrifices of those persons who suffered captivity in foreign lands while in the service of their country. Furthermore, all Arkansans are encouraged to devote some portion of Prisoners of War Remembrance Day in solemn contemplation on the plight of the men and women of this country who have been held prisoners of war.

(c)

The superintendent of each public school in this state shall arrange for appropriate exercises on campus to commemorate Prisoners of War Remembrance Day.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 519, § 1.

1-5-110. National Garden Week.

The first full week in June is hereby established as “National Garden Week”.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 351, § 1.

1-5-111. Arkansas Agriculture Recognition Day.

The first Friday in March of each year is designated as “Arkansas Agriculture Recognition Day” in this state.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 13, § 1.

1-5-112. POW/MIA Recognition Day.

(a)

The third Friday in September shall be known as “POW/MIA Recognition Day” to honor American prisoners of war and those missing in action, all of whom have made extraordinary sacrifices on behalf of the United States of America.

(b)

POW/MIA Recognition Day shall not be a legal holiday, but shall be a memorial day to be commemorated by the issuance of an appropriate proclamation by the Governor.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 917, § 1.

1-5-113. Native American Heritage Week.

(a)

The third week in September of each year shall be known in Arkansas as “Native American Heritage Week” to honor the integral role that Native Americans have played in the history of the state and the rich contributions Native Americans have made to the history of Arkansas, including the state's role as home to many of the roads and trails along the Trail of Tears.

(b)

The Governor shall annually, prior to the third week in September, issue a proclamation proclaiming Native American Heritage Week and in the proclamation shall:

(1)

Comment on the significance that Native Americans have played in the state's history; and

(2)

Call upon the citizens of the state to observe Native American Heritage Week and to commemorate Native Americans' cultural contributions to the heritage of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1117, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted, subsection (a) began “Beginning with September 16 through 22, 2001 … .”

1-5-114. Juneteenth Independence Day.

(a)

The third Saturday in June shall be known as “Juneteenth Independence Day” to commemorate the end of over two hundred (200) years of slavery in the United States of America and to demonstrate racial reconciliation and healing from the legacy of slavery.

(b)

Juneteenth Independence Day shall not be a legal holiday but shall be a memorial day to be commemorated by the issuance of an appropriate proclamation by the Governor.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2101, § 1.

1-5-115. Firefighter Recognition Day.

(a)

January 27 of each year shall be known as “Firefighter Recognition Day” in order to honor the men and women who make extraordinary sacrifices on behalf of the citizens of the State of Arkansas while in the line of duty.

(b)

Firefighter Recognition Day shall not be a legal holiday but shall be a memorial day to be commemorated by the issuance of an appropriate proclamation by the Governor.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 444, § 1.

1-5-116. Hemophilia Awareness Day.

(a)

The General Assembly finds that:

(1)

Hemophilia is the name of several hereditary genetic illnesses that impair the body's ability to control bleeding;

(2)

Hemophilia is characterized by excessive, uncontrollable bleeding caused by missing or low-level clotting factor in the blood;

(3)

Hemophiliac bleeding may occur even when a sufferer has sustained no injury;

(4)

Hemophiliac bleeding most often occurs in the joints and in the head;

(5)

Approximately twenty thousand (20,000) citizens nationwide are suffering from hemophilia, and one (1) in each five thousand (5,000) live male births in the United States results in hemophilia;

(6)

Hemophilia affects males almost exclusively, affecting one in five thousand (1 in 5,000) males;

(7)

Hemophilia occurs in all demographic groups;

(8)

There is no cure for hemophilia; and

(9)

Hemophilia is a lifelong condition that can be controlled with regular injections of the deficient clotting factor.

(b)

The first Monday in May of each year shall be known in Arkansas as “Hemophilia Awareness Day”.

(c)

Hemophilia Awareness Day shall not be a legal holiday but shall be a memorial day to be commemorated by the issuance of an appropriate proclamation by the Governor.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 203, § 1.

1-5-117. Arkansas Music Appreciation Day.

(a)

The General Assembly finds that Arkansas has a proud history of contributing music and musicians to the nation, including without limitation:

(1)

Johnny Cash;

(2)

B. B. King;

(3)

Glen Campbell;

(4)

Charlie Rich;

(5)

Sister Rosetta Tharpe;

(6)

Al Green;

(7)

Conway Twitty; and

(8)

Floyd Cramer.

(b)

September 1 of each year shall be known as “Arkansas Music Appreciation Day” to honor the contributions of Arkansas musicians.

(c)(1)

Arkansas Music Appreciation Day is not a legal holiday but is a memorial day.

(2)

The Governor may issue the appropriate proclamation to commemorate Arkansas Music Appreciation Day each year.

(d)

Each year before September 1, the Governor shall issue a proclamation proclaiming September 1 as Arkansas Music Appreciation Day and in the proclamation shall:

(1)

Comment on the significance of the contributions that Arkansas musicians have made to the nation's music; and

(2)

Call upon the citizens of the state to observe Arkansas Music Appreciation Day.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 546, § 1.

1-5-118. National Day of the Cowboy.

(a)

The General Assembly finds that:

(1)

Pioneering men and women helped build the nation with their ranches and farms, and livestock and agriculture play a vital role in the economic well-being of Arkansas communities;

(2)

The quintessential cowboy and cowgirl play a significant role in American culture, and embody integrity, respect, a strong work ethic, and patriotism, known as the “cowboy code”;

(3)

The vaquero spirit of competition among ranch cowboys and cowgirls is reflected in rodeo events throughout the state that contribute to tourism and the economy;

(4)

Many statewide organizations recognize and encourage young cowboys and cowgirls to be excellent stewards of the land and to preserve this foundation of American heritage;

(5)

Arkansas is the birthplace of cowboy book and film icons, including:

(A)

Charles Portis, who was born in El Dorado, educated at the University of Arkansas at Fayetteville, and authored the cowboy novel “True Grit”;

(B)

Maxwell Henry Aronson, who was born in Little Rock, became the actor “Bronco Billy” Anderson, and was the first cowboy superstar, starring in over three hundred (300) movies and paving the way for other famous cowboy actors; and

(C)

Betty Jeanne Grayson, who was also born in Little Rock, became actress Gail Davis, and inspired young cowgirls as “Annie Oakley” in the 1950s television series of the same name; and

(6)

Many states have declared an annual day to commemorate cowboys.

(b)

The fourth Saturday in July shall be known as “National Day of the Cowboy” to commemorate America's cowboy heritage.

(c)

National Day of the Cowboy is not a legal holiday but is a memorial day to be commemorated by the issuance of an appropriate proclamation by the Governor.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 601, § 1.

1-5-119. Sultana Disaster Remembrance Day.

(a)

The General Assembly finds that:

(1)

The steamboat Sultana was launched from the John Litherbury Shipyard in Cincinnati, Ohio, in February 1863 as one of the largest and best business steamers ever constructed;

(2)

Its capacity of three hundred seventy-six (376) passengers and crew members attracted the United States Army to commandeer it for use as a supply and soldier transport vessel during the Civil War;

(3)

The United States Army chartered the Sultana at Vicksburg, Mississippi, to transport over two thousand three hundred (2,300) passengers, including over two thousand (2,000) recently released Union prisoners of war from the Andersonville and Cahaba prisons in the South back home to the North;

(4)

On April 26, 1865, the Sultana stopped at Helena, Arkansas, the location at which photographer Thomas W. Bankes took the only photograph in existence of the grossly overcrowded vessel and its doomed passengers;

(5)(A)

At 2:00 a.m. on April 27, 1865, the Sultana's boiler system erupted in a massive explosion just seven (7) miles north of Memphis, Tennessee, causing a conflagration of fire and flying shrapnel and the venting of deadly steam that resulted in over two thousand (2,000) casualties, of which more than one thousand two hundred (1,200) died from the explosion itself.

(B)

Nearly seven hundred (700) more individuals were dragged to safety over several hours and taken to five (5) Memphis hospitals, with many perishing later from injuries, burns, and exposure to the frigid Mississippi River floodwaters;

(6)

Several Crittenden County, Arkansas, citizens were officially credited with saving dozens of lives that night by wading into the flooded Mississippi River to retrieve victims of the tragedy as they floated downriver;

(7)

The event was made all the more tragic by evidence of greed, corruption, malfeasance in office, and dereliction of officer duty, as noted by a following United States Army investigation into the disaster;

(8)

The event occurred in the Mound City, Arkansas, and Marion, Arkansas, areas of the Mississippi River, places where the remains of the Sultana and its lost souls still rest today and where Arkansas citizens were the saviors of many survivors that night;

(9)

The United States House of Representatives passed a resolution in 2009 acknowledging the explosion of the SS Sultana as the greatest maritime disaster in United States history; and

(10)

The lives and service of all the soldiers, passengers, and local citizens involved in the tragedy are currently honored and recognized with a temporary exhibit of Sultana artifacts in Marion, Arkansas, with plans for a permanent Sultana Disaster Museum by 2020 in Marion, Arkansas.

(b)

April 27 each year shall be known as “Sultana Disaster Remembrance Day” to commemorate Arkansas's role in the greatest maritime disaster in United States history.

(c)

Sultana Disaster Remembrance Day is not a legal holiday but is a memorial day to be commemorated by the issuance of an appropriate proclamation by the Governor.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 791, § 1.